Tennessee, session 114, SB1564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (70).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Upper Cumberland human resource agency, created by § 13-26-102;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1564
010122
- 1 -